Hawaii, session 2025, SB1492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Act 214, Session Laws of Hawaii 2013 (Act 214), established a task force on mobility management within the department of health.  The task force was required to make recommendations on establishing a transportation framework to assist elders and individuals with disabilities with transportation needs in each county, including recommendations relating to the state budget and program development. In enacting Act 214, the legislature found that Hawaii's residents, including elders and individuals with disabilities, should be able to live at home with the supports they need so that they can participate in communities that value their contributions.  The legislature also found that statewide, especially in rural communities, many residents are without family members nearby to provide transportation and are too frail or disabled to access public transit. Transportation services are often fragmented, underutilized, or difficult to navigate and can be costly because of inconsistent, duplicative, and often restrictive federal and state program rules and regulations.  Due to these circumstances, there is a need for a policy on mobility management, a concept in which a single entity in a geographical area is charged with knowing and deploying the entire array of transportation resources available.  This system would focus on the individual and identify the best resources for that individual. Act 214 required the department of health to submit interim and final reports to the legislature of the task force's findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation.  The task force's final report, submitted to the legislature on January 30, 2015, addressed the development and establishment of a mobility management program and mobility center in a geographical area; cost and qualifications of transportation/mobility coordinators and logistics of developing a mobility center/program; and development of a mobility management master plan for each county and recommended that the State continue to support the counties' efforts in developing their respective mobility management program with the following suggested actions: (1)  Fund local mobility projects identified by the county as priority strategies; (2)  Provide state leadership and coordination for the four counties to leverage federal funding; (3)  Establish a statewide purchasing cooperative among the counties and human service providers to procure new vehicles, technologies, and equipment; and (4)  Support a permanent funding source in any future state or local tax initiative for human service transportation. The legislature further finds that there is still a strong need for mobility management in the State and it is critical that these recommendations are implemented. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the department of transportation to implement the recommendations of the task force on mobility management, established pursuant to Act 214, in consultation with the aging and disability resource center of the executive office on aging and other stakeholder groups. SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the implementation of the recommendations made by the task force on mobility management, established pursuant to Act 214, Session Laws of Hawaii 2013, including funding for the establishment of the following positions: (1) full-time equivalent (     FTE) mobility manager position in each of the counties of Hawaii, Kauai, and Maui; (2) full-time equivalent (     FTE) statewide outreach position; and (3) full-time equivalent (     FTE) statewide coordinator position; provided that the department of transportation shall implement the recommendations made by the task force in consultation with the aging and disability resource center of the executive office on aging and other stakeholder groups. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of transportation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________